Nevada, session 83, SB275-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Maximum annual rent increase percentage” means
the maximum annual rent increase percentage calculated by the
Division pursuant to section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. On or before July 1 of each year, the Division
shall:
(a) Calculate the maximum annual rent increase percentage
required pursuant to NRS 118B.150 for the following fiscal year,
which must be equal to 60 percent of the May annual 12-month
average change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, West Region (All Items), as most recently published
by the United States Department of Labor;
(b) Publish on an Internet website maintained by the Division
the maximum annual rent increase percentage for that fiscal year;
and
(c) Issue a press release containing the maximum annual rent
increase percentage for that fiscal year.
2. The Division shall maintain the information for each
maximum annual rent increase percentage calculated pursuant to
subsection 1 on an Internet website maintained by the Division for
at least 2 years.
3. As used in this section, “fiscal year” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 354.526.
Sec. 4. 1. A landlord or his or her agent or employee may
apply to the Division for an exemption from the requirements of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 118B.150 if the cost of
operating the manufactured home park exceeds the amount the
park would earn with the limit on the maximum annual rent
increase established pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 118B.150.
-
*SB275_R1*

– 3 –
2. An application for an exemption submitted pursuant to
subsection 1 must include:
(a) Any proof necessary to justify an exemption; and
(b) A report that demonstrates the need for an exemption
which must be prepared by a certified public accountant certified
to practice in this State pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628
of NRS.
3. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 5. NRS 118B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118B.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 118B.0105 to
118B.0195, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 118B.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118B.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, the landlord or his or her agent or employee shall not:
(a) Increase rent or additional charges unless:
(1) The rent charged after the increase is the same rent
charged for manufactured homes of the same size or lots of the same
size or of a similar location within the park, including, without
limitation, manufactured homes and lots which are held pursuant to
a long-term lease, except that a discount may be selectively given to
persons who:
(I) Are handicapped;
(II) Are 55 years of age or older;
(III) Are long-term tenants of the park if the landlord has
specified in the rental agreement or lease the period of tenancy
required to qualify for such a discount;
(IV) Pay their rent in a timely manner; or
(V) Pay their rent by check, money order or electronic
means;
(2) Any increase in additional charges for special services is
the same amount for each tenant using the special service; and
(3) Written notice advising a tenant of the increase is
received by the tenant 90 days before the first payment to be
increased and written notice of the increase is given to prospective
tenants before commencement of their tenancy. In addition to the
notice provided to a tenant pursuant to this subparagraph, if the
landlord or his or her agent or employee knows or reasonably should
know that the tenant receives assistance from the Account, the
landlord or his or her agent or employee shall provide to the
Administrator written notice of the increase 90 days before the first
payment to be increased.
-
*SB275_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this act and in
addition to the requirements of paragraph (a), increase rent for a
tenancy that is from month to month and not a long-term lease
unless the amount of the increase does not exceed the maximum
annual rent increase percentage calculated by the Division
pursuant to section 3 of this act that is in effect at the time the
landlord or his or her agent or employee is required to provide
notice of an increase pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph
(a), plus the amount of pass-through expenses actually incurred
by the landlord of the manufactured home park.
(c) Require a tenant to pay for an improvement to the common
area of a manufactured home park unless the landlord is required to
make the improvement pursuant to an ordinance of a local
government.
[(c)] (d) Require a tenant to pay for a capital improvement to
the manufactured home park unless the tenant has notice of the
requirement at the time the tenant enters into the rental agreement.
A tenant may not be required to pay for a capital improvement after
the tenant enters into the rental agreement unless the tenant consents
to it in writing or is given 60 days’ notice of the requirement in
writing. The landlord may not establish such a requirement unless a
meeting of the tenants is held to discuss the proposal and the
landlord provides each tenant with notice of the proposal and
the date, time and place of the meeting not less than 60 days before
the meeting. The notice must include a copy of the proposal. A
notice in a periodic publication of the park does not constitute notice
for the purposes of this paragraph.
[(d)] (e) Require a tenant to pay the rent by check or money
order.
[(e)] (f) Require a tenant who pays the rent in cash to apply any
change to which the tenant is entitled to the next periodic payment
that is due. The landlord or his or her agent or employee shall have
an adequate amount of money available to provide change to such a
tenant.
[(f)] (g) Prohibit or require fees or deposits for any meetings
held in the park’s community or recreational facility by the tenants
or occupants of any manufactured home or recreational vehicle in
the park to discuss the park’s affairs, or any political meeting
sponsored by a tenant, if the meetings are held at reasonable hours
and when the facility is not otherwise in use, or prohibit the
distribution of notices of those meetings.
[(g)] (h) Interrupt, with the intent to terminate occupancy, any
utility service furnished the tenant except for nonpayment of utility
charges when due. Any landlord who violates this paragraph is
liable to the tenant for actual damages.
-
*SB275_R1*

– 5 –
[(h)] (i) Prohibit a tenant from having guests, but the landlord
may require the tenant to register the guest within 48 hours after his
or her arrival, Sundays and legal holidays excluded, and if the park
is a secured park, a guest may be required to register upon entering
and leaving.
[(i)] (j) Charge a fee for a guest who does not stay with the
tenant for more than a total of 60 days in a calendar year. The tenant
of a manufactured home lot who is living alone may allow one other
person to live in his or her home without paying an additional
charge or fee, unless such a living arrangement constitutes a
violation of chapter 315 of NRS. No agreement between a tenant
and his or her guest alters or varies the terms of the rental contract
between the tenant and the landlord, and the guest is subject to the
rules and regulations of the landlord.
[(j)] (k) Prohibit a tenant from erecting a fence on the tenant’s
lot if the fence complies with any standards for fences established
by the landlord, including limitations established for the location
and height of fences, the materials used for fences and the manner in
which fences are to be constructed.
[(k)] (l) Prohibit any tenant from soliciting membership in any
association which is formed by the tenants who live in the park. As
used in this paragraph, “solicit” means to make an oral or written
request for membership or the payment of dues or to distribute,
circulate or post a notice for payment of those dues.
[(l)] (m) Prohibit a public officer, candidate for public office or
the representative of a public officer or candidate for public office
from walking through the park to talk with the tenants or distribute
political material.
[(m)] (n) If a tenant has voluntarily assumed responsibility to
trim the trees on his or her lot, require the tenant to trim any
particular tree located on the lot or dispose of the trimmings unless a
danger or hazard exists.
[(n)] (o) Charge a fee for a late monthly rental payment by a
federal worker, tribal worker, state worker or household member of
such a worker during a shutdown.
2. The landlord is entitled to require a security deposit from a
tenant who wants to use the manufactured home park’s clubhouse,
swimming pool or other park facilities for the tenant’s exclusive use.
The landlord may require the deposit at least 1 week before the use.
The landlord shall apply the deposit to costs which occur due to
damage or cleanup from the tenant’s use within 1 week after the use,
if any, and shall, on or before the eighth day after the use, refund
any unused portion of the deposit to the tenant making the deposit.
The landlord is not required to place such a deposit into a financial
institution or to pay interest on the deposit.
-
*SB275_R1*

– 6 –
3. The provisions of paragraphs (a), [(b),] (c), [(j)] (d), (k) and
[(m)] (n) of subsection 1 do not apply to a corporate cooperative
park.
4. As used in this section [, “long-term] :
(a) “Long-term lease” means a rental agreement or lease the
duration of which exceeds 12 months.
(b) “Pass-through expense” means the actual costs and
expenses incurred by a landlord that are passed on to a tenant
without markup. The term does not include overhead,
administrative expenses or profits.
Sec. 6.5. On or before July 1, 2023, the Housing Division of
the Department of Business and Industry shall, in accordance with
section 3 of this act, determine the maximum annual rent increase
percentage for Fiscal Year 2023-2024.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and section 6.5 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2023, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB275_R1*